Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 9 Law Enforcement Officer Training and Standards
12-9-106. Selection and training requirements — Exceptions.

The Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training shall provide by rule that a person shall not be appointed as a law enforcement officer, except on a temporary basis not to exceed nine (9) months, unless the person has satisfactorily completed a program of police training at a school approved by the commission.

If the executive body of the commission determines that extraordinary circumstances exist, the commission may approve an extension of temporary employment.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section and § 12-9-104(7), the commission, by rules, shall fix such other qualifications as it deems necessary.

However, no person who pleads or is found guilty of a felony shall be eligible to be appointed or certified as a law enforcement officer.

The commission shall issue a certificate evidencing satisfaction of the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this section to any applicant who presents such evidence as may be required by its rules of satisfactory completion of a program or course of instruction in this or another state conforming to the content and quality required by the commission for approved education and training.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude any employing agency from establishing qualifications and standards for hiring, training, compensating, or promoting law enforcement officers that exceed those set by the commission.

Law enforcement officers already serving under full-time permanent appointment on December 31, 1977, shall not be required to meet the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this section as a condition of tenure or continued employment, nor shall failure of any such law enforcement officer to fulfill the requirements make him or her ineligible.

Law enforcement officers employed prior to January 1, 1976, may continue their employment and participate in training programs on a voluntary or assigned basis, but failure to meet standards shall not be grounds for their dismissal or termination of employment. Subsequent termination of employment, whether voluntary or involuntary, shall not result in revocation of this exclusion status but such officers shall have the same powers, privileges, and rights and shall be subject to the same rules and restrictions as are applicable to officers whose certification is based on formal training.

Personnel of law enforcement agencies whose status as to coverage under this subchapter is questionable on December 31, 1977, but who are subsequently determined to be subject thereto, shall have an effective date of compliance enforcement as set by the commission, and personnel employed prior to that date shall be excluded from mandatory compliance therewith.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “rule” for “regulation” and inserted “or probationary”; subdivided (a)(2); inserted “or background investigation” in (a)(2)(A); and in (a)(2)(B), inserted “If the executive body of the commission determines under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section that extraordinary circumstances exist” and substituted “temporary or probationaryemployment” for “probation”; and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment deleted “or probationary” following “temporary” throughout (a).

The 2017 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “nine (9) months” for “one (1) year” and deleted “preparatory” preceding “program”; deleted former (a)(2)(A) and redesignated former (a)(2)(B) as (a)(2); in (a)(2), deleted “under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section” following “determines” and “for no more than an eight-month period” at the end.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “rules and regulations” in (b)(1); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (c).

Cross References. County sheriff as law enforcement officer, §12-9-112.

While §12-9-108 does not itemize the standards required, the standards are not unconstitutionally vague because they are either set out under this section in particular or as part of the commission rules. McEntire v. State, 305 Ark. 470, 808 S.W.2d 762 (1991).

There is no requirement under this section that officers be bonded in order to lawfully execute their duties. Dilday v. State, 300 Ark. 249, 778 S.W.2d 618 (1989).

Where a supervising officer testified he had been employed continuously as a full-time police officer for the past fourteen years at various police departments, and on cross-examination stated there had been one interval of three weeks between the time he worked for two cities, but was not asked whether he was on some type of leave during this period, it could not be said that his testimony that he had been continuously employed as a policeman was in error. King v. State, 304 Ark. 592, 804 S.W.2d 360 (1991).

Supreme Court did not need to determine whether the trial court was clearly erroneous in finding of fact that the personnel file belonging to the arresting auxiliary officer's supervising officer contained a diploma and physical report as required under minimum standards set by the Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training, because, even if it did not, the supervising officer was grandfathered in by subdivision (e)(1). King v. State, 304 Ark. 592, 804 S.W.2d 360 (1991).

Cited: Smith v. State, 278 Ark. 462, 648 S.W.2d 792 (1983); Karr v. Townsend, 606 F. Supp. 1121 (W.D. Ark. 1985); Lamb v. State, 21 Ark. App. 111, 730 S.W.2d 252 (1987); Pipes v. State, 22 Ark. App. 235, 738 S.W.2d 423 (1987); Dilday v. State, 300 Ark. 249, 778 S.W.2d 618 (1989); Kittler v. State, 304 Ark. 344, 802 S.W.2d 925 (1991); City of Pocahontas v. Huddleston, 309 Ark. 353, 831 S.W.2d 138 (1992).

The division shall administer the training and certification program for court security officers under the Arkansas Court Security Act, § 16-10-1001 et seq.

Persons such as doctors, nurses, firefighters, first responders, or other medical personnel, persons engaged in homeland security, or persons otherwise engaged in assisting in the protection of public welfare and safety who are not law enforcement personnel may attend training or receive instruction at the invitation of the division.

The division may assess a fee on a person invited to attend training or receive instruction under this subsection to reimburse the division for costs associated with the training or instruction under this subsection.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2007, No. 576, § 3, provided:

“The General Assembly recommends:

“(1)That the Supreme Court develop a comprehensive policy on security and emergency preparedness for the judicial branch of the government;

“(2)That the Supreme Court establish standards for every county for the development of a local security and emergency preparedness plan for circuit courts in the county and establish standards for every city in which a district court is located for the development of a local security and emergency preparedness plan for district courts in the city; and

“(3)(A)That the Supreme Court create a Security and Emergency Preparedness Advisory Committee.

“(B)The committee should be inclusive of judges, law enforcement officers, sheriffs, city and county executive officers, emergency preparedness officials, legislators, and others involved in providing security to the courts.

“(C)Legislative representation on the committee should be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.”

Amendments. The 2005 amendment added (e).

The 2007 amendment added (f).

The 2011 amendment redesignated former (a) as present (a)(1) and added (a)(2); substituted “Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy” for “law enforcement training academy” in (d)(1); and added (d)(3), (g)(1) and (g)(2).

The 2017 amendment deleted “including provision for training participants under twenty-one (21) years of age in the Arkansas Police Corps Scholarship Program” at the end of (b).

The 2019 amendment substituted “division” for “commission” throughout the section; substituted “Division of Law Enforcement Standards andTraining” for “Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training” in (a)(1); and substituted “division” for “Arkansas LawEnforcement Training Academy” in (d)(1).

Cited: Lamb v. State, 21 Ark. App. 111, 730 S.W.2d 252 (1987).

Notification of a suspension under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section shall be made in a timely manner to the administrator of the law enforcement agency by which the law enforcement officer is employed.

(1)Nothing in this subchapter or any requirements made by the commission shall prevent any action by a private citizen that is now authorized by law.

Nothing in this subchapter or any other law shall prohibit inspectors and code enforcement officers of cities, towns, or counties from issuing citations for the violation of municipal or county codes, ordinances, or regulations that they are charged by their city, town, or county with the duty of enforcing.

Cities of the first class, cities of the second class, and incorporated towns are authorized to employ persons or to contract with private or public corporations, associations, or other entities, whether charitable, nonprofit, or for profit, that employ persons who do not meet certification requirements prescribed by the commission to enforce and execute any or all provisions of a municipal parking enforcement ordinance, including, but not limited to, the issuance of citations, the collection of fines, and any other parking enforcement process or procedure as may be established by ordinance of the municipality.

Persons employed under this subdivision (b)(4) shall not carry firearms nor take any other official law enforcing action except that enumerated in subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 44, § 2, provided:

“It is hereby the intent of the General Assembly by amending the minimum standards for law enforcement officials, ab initio, that actions taken by law enforcement officers that are pending before any Court, Grand Jury, Department, Officer, Agency, Regulatory Body, Legislative Committee, or other authority of the United States, a State, or a Politicial Subdivision shall not be held invalid merely because of the failure to meet the standards and qualifications.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted “or counties” once and “or county” twice in (b)(3), and made related changes.

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (a) as (a)(1); and added (a)(2).

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey, Criminal Law, 12 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 617.

Note. Some cases noted below were decided under former version of this section before the 1989 amendment.

The retroactive application of Acts 1989, No. 44, which amended subsection (a) to provide that action taken by non-qualified officers “shall not be held invalid”, does not violate the ex post facto clause because: 1) it does not punish as a crime an act previously committed, which was innocent when done; 2) it does not make more burdensome the punishment for a crime, after its commission; 3) it does not alter a legal rule of evidence to receive less or different testimony than was required at the time of the commission of the offense; and 4) it does not deprive a defendant of any defense available according to at the time when the act was committed. Ridenhour v. State, 305 Ark. 90, 805 S.W.2d 639 (1991); Mitchell v. State, 306 Ark. 383, 814 S.W.2d 904 (1991).

While this section does not itemize the standards required, the standards are not unconstitutionally vague because they are either set out under §12-9-106 in particular or as part of the commission rules. McEntire v. State, 305 Ark. 470, 808 S.W.2d 762 (1991).

The retroactive application of Acts 1989, No. 44 was not prohibited by the ex post facto clauses of our federal and state constitutions where defendant was arrested on February 11, 1989, and his motion to dismiss was denied on August 17, 1989, but the trial was held on October 16, 1990, and judgment was entered on October 22, 1990; therefore, the case was pending when Acts 1989, No. 44 was enacted. Ellis v. State, 306 Ark. 461, 816 S.W.2d 164 (1991).

This section deals with standards for employment. It does not deal with police conduct. Moore v. State, 303 Ark. 514, 798 S.W.2d 87 (1990).

Subsection (a) applies to “all of the standards,” leaving no room for an interpretation that makes a distinction between employment standards and training standards. Harshaw v. State, 313 Ark. 51, 852 S.W.2d 318 (1993).

The goal of this section and the goal of the exclusionary rule are different. The goal of this section is to compel police department administrators to check the backgrounds of those seeking to become officers, and to hire only psychologically qualified persons to serve as policemen, whereas, the exclusionary rule is designed to deter unlawful police conduct and compels respect for the Fourth Amendment by removing the incentive to disregard it. Moore v. State, 303 Ark. 514, 798 S.W.2d 87 (1990); Collins v. State, 304 Ark. 587, 804 S.W.2d 680 (1991).

Application of section, as amended in 1989, to a case pending at the time of the amendment, was not a violation of the prohibition against ex post facto laws. Harbour v. State, 305 Ark. 316, 807 S.W.2d 663 (1991).

It was proper to apply this section as amended by Acts 1989, No. 44, which removed the strictures previously invalidating actions taken by officers not meeting the commission's qualifications, to cases pending at the time Act 44 was enacted. Barnes v. State, 305 Ark. 428, 810 S.W.2d 909 (1991).

This section provides that action taken by an unqualified person “shall be held as invalid.” It does not indicate that actions taken by others should be held invalid or that an exclusionary rule should be applied. Moore v. State, 303 Ark. 514, 798 S.W.2d 87 (1990).

Section16-81-106 and this section are repugnant in that §16-81-106 provides that only certified law enforcement officers have the authority to make arrests, while this section provides that it does not matter whether officers are certified in order to make a valid arrest; however, that limited difference did not repeal the authority of law enforcement officers to make arrests, and a law officer who is vested with the authority to make arrests can issue citations. McDaniel v. State, 309 Ark. 20, 826 S.W.2d 286 (1992).

There is no requirement under this section that officers be bonded in order to lawfully execute their duties. Dilday v. State, 300 Ark. 249, 778 S.W.2d 618 (1989).

Law enforcement officers are not disqualified as witnesses based on whether they have met the criteria set forth by regulations promulgated by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training. A person is presumed to be competent to be a witness. Cherry v. State, 302 Ark. 462, 791 S.W.2d 354 (1990).

Subsection (a) does not invalidate any action taken by a police officer if the officer was not hired in compliance with the minimum standards set by the commission, as such an interpretation would place police departments in the impossible position of never being able to rectify an erroneous hiring practice from previous years. Goode v. State, 303 Ark. 609, 798 S.W.2d 430 (1990).

While deputy had not met commission standards when he was hired in 1982 because the results of the federal fingerprint search were not placed in his file as required by regulation of the commission, that deficiency was corrected by 1984 and from that point on, deputy was in compliance with the commission's standards. Goode v. State, 303 Ark. 609, 798 S.W.2d 430 (1990).

After the 1989 amendment to subsection (a) of this section, the exclusionary rule no longer applied in cases involving officers who were not qualified. Harshaw v. State, 313 Ark. 51, 852 S.W.2d 318 (1993).

Chief of police who was not certified during part of tenure could not validly act as law enforcement officer during that period; however, where he was validly employed by the city, his salary was reasonable, and he acted in good faith, the city was not entitled to a refund of the compensation paid him during the period of noncertification. Allen v. Titsworth, 279 Ark. 138, 649 S.W.2d 185 (1983).

The exclusionary rule should not be applied in a situation involving both qualified and unqualified officers; thus, where several law enforcement officials participated in defendant's arrest and at least one of them was properly qualified to so participate there was a valid arrest. Kittler v. State, 304 Ark. 344, 802 S.W.2d 925 (1991).

Defendant's conviction was not overturned where arrest was invalid because arresting deputy had not completed the training required by §12-9-106, because an invalid arrest may call for the suppression of a confession or other evidence, but it does not entitle the defendant to be discharged from responsibility for the offense. Pipes v. State, 22 Ark. App. 235, 738 S.W.2d 423 (1987).

Arrests of the defendants were not invalidated merely because the arresting officers' file failed to contain the specified medical forms required by the commission. Barnes v. State, 305 Ark. 428, 810 S.W.2d 909 (1991).

Where none of the five arresting officers met the minimum employment standards established by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training the exclusionary rule need not be applied where there is no police misconduct. State v. Henry, 304 Ark. 339, 802 S.W.2d 448 (1991).

Where the trial court denied the defendant's request to examine the arresting officers' personnel files but then held the officers to be properly qualified, there was no prejudice to defendant, and thus no grounds for reversal, since the officer's compliance or noncompliance with the standards was established through testimony. Kittler v. State, 304 Ark. 344, 802 S.W.2d 925 (1991).

Where arresting officer's psychological report did not contain recommendations pursuant to Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training regulations, his arrest of defendant was invalid. Freeman v. City of DeWitt, 301 Ark. 581, 787 S.W.2d 658 (1990).

Since a fingerprint check to disclose any criminal record pursuant to minimum standards for employment or appointment is mandatory rather than directory and the arresting officer's fingerprint check was completed but lost and he was hired “in the dark,” his arrest of defendant was invalid. Johnson v. City of Kensett, 301 Ark. 592, 787 S.W.2d 651 (1990).

Where the charges asserted against the defendant were by prosecutor's information and not an officer's citation, and even though the officer had made an initial arrest of the defendant on another minor traffic offense, the validity of the charging instrument and the exclusionary rule were not involved. Moore v. State, 304 Ark. 257, 801 S.W.2d 638 (1990).

Pursuant to subsection (a), arrest by campus patrolman was not invalid although the patrolman's FBI fingerprint check had not been completed, and he had therefore not satisfied the minimum law enforcement standards when he arrested the defendant. Smith v. City of Little Rock, 305 Ark. 168, 806 S.W.2d 371 (1991).

Cited: Smith v. State, 278 Ark. 462, 648 S.W.2d 792 (1983); Lamb v. State, 21 Ark. App. 111, 730 S.W.2d 252 (1987); Huls v. State, 301 Ark. 572, 785 S.W.2d 467 (1990); Ellis v. State, 302 Ark. 597, 791 S.W.2d 370 (1990); King v. State, 304 Ark. 592, 804 S.W.2d 360 (1991); Whitaker v. State, 37 Ark. App. 112, 825 S.W.2d 827 (1992).

History.

Acts 1975, No. 452, § 8; 1979, No. 642, § 1; 1983, No. 905, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1007; Acts 1999, No. 1472, § 1; 2009, No. 793, § 2; 2013, No. 1061, § 1; 2017, No. 497, § 5; 2019, No. 315, §§ 851, 852.

12-9-107. Training programs.

(1)For the purpose of this subchapter, the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training may cooperate with federal, state, and local law enforcement agencies in establishing and conducting instruction and training programs for law enforcement officers of this state, its counties, and municipalities.

Cooperation under subdivision (a)(1) of this section may include without limitation the use of any training facility, equipment, or personnel to conduct training or provide services for any law enforcement or public safety purpose.

The division shall establish and maintain police training programs through such agencies and institutions as the division may deem appropriate to carry out the intent of this subchapter.

The division shall work with each state agency and political subdivision that adheres to the selection and training standards established by the division to provide allowable tuition, living, and training expenses incurred by the officers in attendance at approved training programs.

(1)It is the intent of this subchapter that the expenses of attending the approved training programs established under subsection (c) of this section shall be furnished by the state through the division or any other manner that may be prescribed by the division, and no cost or charge shall be made to any local political subdivision for the actual cost of the training.

The state shall not be liable for the travel cost or any salary in connection with attending any training program.

The division may accept reimbursement from any public or private entity for the use of its training facilities, equipment, or personnel during the providing of services.

The expenses of attending training provided pursuant to a memorandum of understanding between the State of Arkansas and the United States Department of Justice or the United States Department of Homeland Security shall be paid in accordance with the provisions of §12-8-104.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 452, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1008; Acts 1997, No. 1203, § 4; 2005, No. 907, § 3; 2007, No. 576, § 2; 2011, No. 188, § 1; 2017, No. 497, § 6; 2019, No. 910, § 5813.

12-9-108. Failure to meet qualifications — Effect — Exemptions.

(1)Actions taken by law enforcement officers who do not meet all of the standards and qualifications set forth in this subchapter or made by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training shall not be held invalid merely because of the failure to meet the standards and qualifications.

(A)The Director of Law Enforcement Standards and Training may temporarily suspend a law enforcement officer's ability to act as a law enforcement officer for failure to meet the standards or qualifications under this subchapter until the failure is corrected or pending review by the commission.

No provision of this subchapter shall affect the deputizing of a private citizen by a law enforcement officer in a time of a disaster or emergency.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 452, § 10; 1983, No. 763, § 1; 1985, No. 580, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-4912, 19-4913, 42-1009; Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 44, § 1; 1999, No. 1247, § 1; 2009, No. 204, § 1; 2017, No. 497, § 7.

12-9-109. Legal counsel.

The Attorney General shall serve as legal counsel to the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training, but he or she may designate one (1) or more members of his or her staff to provide legal service to the commission.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 452, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1002.

12-9-110. Training of civilians to file parking violations and traffic accident reports.

The Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training shall by rule establish the qualifications including minimum training standards for persons performing law enforcement-related duties pursuant to this section within cities of the first class and within other areas of the State of Arkansas for cadets that are appointed by the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police.

Municipal police departments of cities of the first class and the Division of Arkansas State Police may employ persons who do not meet certification requirements prescribed by the commission, and the persons may:

Issue citations for parking violations occurring within their respective jurisdictions; and

Prepare traffic accident reports and issue any related traffic citations.

Persons employed under this section shall not carry firearms or take any other official law enforcement action except as prescribed by this section.

Persons performing law enforcement duties pursuant to this section shall complete all training and meet all minimum standards prescribed by the commission for the exercise of that authority.

However, the division and cities of the first class may establish more stringent training requirements.

Publisher's Notes. Former §12-9-110, concerning the Advisory Board on Law Enforcement Standards and Training, was repealed by Acts 1989, No. 25 § 3. The former section was derived from Acts 1975, No. 452, §§ 3, 4; 1981, No. 45, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-701.1, 42-1002, 42-1003.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment, in (b), substituted “Municipal police departments of cities” for “Cities” and Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “commission”; and added “and issue any related traffic citations” at the end of (b)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for“Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a) and (b); and “division” for “department” in (d)(2).

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added “and law enforcement officers employed by the commission” at the end of (a).

The 2018 amendment, in (a), deleted “After seeking prior review by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee and approval by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State” from the beginning and substituted “is” for “shall be”; and, in (b), inserted “under subsection (a) of this section” and substituted “is” for “shall be”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “commission” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, No. 202, § 12: July 1, 2018.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 910, § 1; 2001, No. 250, § 1; 2003, No. 1111, § 1; 2007, No. 137, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 853; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5814-5816.

12-9-111. Uniforms.

The Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training is exempt from §19-6-109(c) for the purpose of buying uniforms for students and law enforcement officers employed by the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training.

The amount spent for the purchase of uniforms under subsection (a) of this section in any one (1) year is limited to forty thousand dollars ($40,000).

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1022, § 7; 2017, No. 497, § 8; 2018, No. 202, §
9; 2019, No. 910, § 5817.

12-9-112. County sheriff as law enforcement officer.

A former county sheriff of a county who has served as county sheriff within that county for at least eight (8) years and who meets all minimum hiring standards prescribed by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training is qualified to be employed as a law enforcement officer with a municipality, county, or state board.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1472, § 2; 2015, No. 1045, § 1.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “eight (8) years” for “ten (10) years”, inserted “and who meets all minimum hiring standards prescribed by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training”, substituted “is qualified” for “shall be deemed qualified”, and substituted “with a municipality, county, or state board” for “for any municipality located within that county, notwithstanding any law or regulation to the contrary”.

Cross References. Selection and training requirements — Exceptions, §12-9-106.

12-9-113. Domestic violence training.

In accordance with the certification requirements of the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training for law enforcement officers, all new law enforcement officers in the State of Arkansas shall complete at least twenty (20) hours of training in domestic violence and twenty (20) hours of training in child abuse.

Practicum training will also be sufficient for this requirement.

Pertaining to domestic abuse, the topics that shall be covered are:

The dynamics of domestic abuse;

The Domestic Abuse Act of 1991, § 9-15-101 et seq.;

Domestic abuse victim interview techniques;

Supportive services available; and

Pro-arrest guidelines and drawbacks of dual arrest and practices to promote the safety of officers.

Pertaining to child abuse victim interview techniques, the topics that shall be covered are:

Current law, including the Child Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-101 et seq., and the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq.;

Child sexual abuse; and

Physical and behavioral indicators.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted, subdivision (a)(1) contained the phrase “effective September 1, 2001” immediately preceding “all new law enforcement officers.”

Acts 2009, No. 758, § 29, provided:

“Contingent Effectiveness. This act shall not become effective unless an act of the Eighty-Seventh General Assembly repealing the Arkansas Child Maltreatment Act, §12-12-501 et seq., and enacting a new Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq., becomes effective.”

The contingency in Acts 2009, No. 758, § 29, was met by Acts 2009, No. 749.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq.” for “Arkansas Child Maltreatment Act, §12-12-501 et seq.” in (c)(1).

Support services available to sexual assault victims.

Cross References. Sexual offenses, §5-14-101 et seq.

This section did not impose a duty on a county to train its officers not to sexually assault detainees. First, the statute did not create a duty for the county to train its officers on the laws concerning sexual assault and instead mandated that the subject be included in basic training, and second, even if the statute did imply that the county had a duty to ensure its officers were trained on the laws concerning sexual assault, that obligation did not require that the county train its officers not to violate those laws, nor did it require that officers be trained on which violations constituted felonies.Parrish v. Ball, 594 F.3d 993 (8th Cir. 2010).

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1452, § 1; 2009, No. 758, § 22.

12-9-114. Training concerning sexual assaults.

(1)The Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training shall require all law enforcement officers to complete a minimum of twenty (20) hours of training concerning sexual assaults as a part of the basic police training course curriculum.

Practicum training will be sufficient for this requirement.

At a minimum, the training shall cover the following topics:

The dynamics of sexual assault;

The laws concerning sexual assault;

Sexual assault victim interview techniques; and

History.

Acts 2003, No. 509, § 1.

12-9-115. Training for constables.

After consultation with the Arkansas Constables Association, Inc., the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training shall develop and certify a training course of one hundred ten (110) hours to one hundred sixty (160) hours for constables in accordance with §14-14-1314.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 841, § 3; 2017, No. 497, § 9; 2019, No. 910, § 5818.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment inserted “and certify”, substituted “one hundred ten (110)” for “one hundred twenty (120)”, and substituted “for constables in accordance with §14-14-1314” for “for certifying new constables”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training”.

Cross References. Access to criminal history records, §12-12-211.

Constable training requirements and uniform requirements, §14-14-1314.